Maine, session 132, LD31.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§12, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. If the parent of a military-connected student is transferred or pending transfer
within the State, a school administrative unit shall:
(1) Allow the student to continue attending the student's current school;
(2) Allow the student to enroll in the student's prospective school prior to
establishing residence; or
(3) Allow the student to enroll at a school located where the student will reside
with a noncustodial guardian.
Student transfers under this paragraph that take place during a student's final year of
high school must conform with section 20107.
Page 1 - 132LR0335(03)